Washington statutes.
RCW 3.30.040

Sessions.

The district courts shall be open except on nonjudicial days. Sessions of the court shall be held at such places as shall be provided by the district court districting plan. The court shall sit as often as business requires in each city of the district which provides suitable courtroom facilities, to hear causes in which such city is the plaintiff.

[ 1984 c 258 s 5; 1961 c 299 s 4.]

NOTES:

Court Improvement Act of 1984—Effective dates—Severability—Short title—1984 c 258: See notes following RCW 3.30.010.